Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-712
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Compressed Fuel Tax Act and sections 66-482 to 66-4,149, 66-501 to 66-531, and 66-712 to 66-736:

(1) Department means the Department of Revenue;

(2) Motor fuel means any fuel defined as motor vehicle fuel in section 66-482, any fuel defined as diesel fuel in section 66-482, and any fuel defined as compressed fuel in section 66-6,100;

(3) Motor fuel laws means the Compressed Fuel Tax Act and sections 66-482 to 66-4,149, 66-501 to 66-531, and 66-712 to 66-736; and

(4) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, company, agency, association, corporation, state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision. Whenever a fine, imprisonment, or both are prescribed or imposed in sections 66-712 to 66-736, the word person as applied to a partnership, a limited liability company, or an association means the partners or members thereof.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 107;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 398;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 95;

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 52;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 19;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 45;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 35;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB177, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 6.

Compressed Fuel Tax Act, see section 66-697.